Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-105] Extraterritorial
jurisdiction; group policies. No group long-term insurance coverage may be
offered to a resident of this State under a group policy issued in another
state to a group described in paragraph (4) under the definition of "group
long-term care insurance" in section 431:10H-104, unless this State or
another state having statutory and regulatory long-term care insurance
requirements substantially similar to those adopted in this State has made a
determination that these requirements have been met. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next